Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6843
Insurer, defined.

Insurer means an entity that contracts to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health care services under a health benefits plan, including (1) any individual or group sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any hospital, medical, or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for a policy that provides coverage for a specified disease or other limited-benefit coverage, and (2) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 10.